Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 184.489 is amended to read:
184.489. As used in ORS 184.489 to 184.498 and 419B.112:
(1) “CASA Volunteer Program” means a program that is approved or sanctioned  by a juvenile
court, has received accreditation from the National CASA Association and has entered  into a con-
tract  with  the  statewide coordinating entity contracted with by the  Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services under ORS 184.492 to recruit, train and supervise diverse and culturally
responsive volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
(2) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 184.492 is amended to read:
184.492. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall:
[(a) Contract with all CASA  Volunteer Programs in this state to recruit, train and supervise court
appointed special advocates. The department may delegate authority to contract under this paragraph
to the statewide coordinating entity contracted with under paragraph (b) of this subsection. ]
[(b)] (a)  Contract with a nongovernmental  entity to serve as the statewide coordinating entity
for the provision  of court appointed special advocate services throughout this state. The nongov-
ernmental entity must be a member of the National CASA  Association and have a board or other
membership structure that contains directors from the CASA Volunteer Programs in this state. At
a minimum, the contract must include authority for the statewide coordinating entity to:
(A) Contract with CASA Volunteer Programs; and
(B) Disburse and expend moneys in the Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established  in
ORS 184.498 to CASA Volunteer Programs in this state .[; and ]
[(C) Execute the standards described in paragraph (c) of this subsection. ]
[(c) Oversee  and monitor CASA Volunteer Program standards, with assistance from the statewide
coordinating entity contracted with by  the department under paragraph (b) of this subsection, to recruit,
train and supervise court appointed special advocates. ]
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 1
[(d)] (b) Disburse and expend moneys in the Court Appointed Special  Advocate Fund established
under ORS 184.498 for the purposes set forth in  this section and ORS 419B.112. The department
[may] shall  disburse and expend moneys from the fund  to the statewide coordinating entity con-
tracted with pursuant to paragraph [ (b)] (a)  of  this subsection for the purposes set forth in this
section and ORS 419B.112.  No moneys may be distributed to a CASA Volunteer Program  until
the program has submitted to the statewide coordinating entity the program’s annual di-
versity, equity, inclusion and accountability plan.
[(e)] (c)  [With the assistance  of] Contract with the statewide coordinating entity contracted with
pursuant to paragraph [ (b)] (a)  of  this subsection[ , oversee ] for oversight of  the provision of court
appointed special advocate services throughout this state in a uniform, equitable, consistent and
cost-efficient manner [ by ensuring ] and to ensure  that CASA Volunteer Programs[ :] comply with
the state standards and practices and with the National CASA  Association’s standards and
practices and perform the duties and functions under ORS 419B.112.
[(A) Adopt policies, procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the provision of court ap-
pointed special advocate services as directed by the department; and ]
[(B) Develop and provide training  and education for court appointed special advocates and em-
ployees and other volunteers in CASA Volunteer Programs as directed by the department. ]
[(f) Identify statewide outcome or performance measures for CASA Volunteer Programs. ]
[(g) Collect, evaluate and summarize data regarding CASA Volunteer  Programs and court ap-
pointed special advocate services in this state. ]
[(h)] (d) Require the  statewide coordinating entity contracted with pursuant to paragraph
(a) of this  subsection to oversee the CASA Volunteer Programs to ensure that each program:
(A) Uses metrics to track volunteer demographics and develops  a detailed diversity
recruitment plan that reflects the demographics of children in foster care in the counties
served by the program;
(B) Adopts a mission and values statement;
(C) Regularly  reviews and updates its plans and policies consistent with the National
CASA Association’s standards, including an annual review and update of  the program’s di-
versity, equity, inclusion and accountability plans;
(D) Conducts an annual financial audit or review; and
(E) Has a sustainable growth plan, if applicable.
(e) Require the statewide coordinating entity contracted with pursuant to  paragraph (a)
of this section to develop and provide training and  education for court appointed special ad-
vocates and employees and other volunteers in CASA Volunteer Programs.  The training and
education must be consistent with the National CASA Association’s standards and  include
culturally specific and community-responsive training  components. The training and educa-
tion for each program must be tailored to the program’s identified equity and outreach
needs. The statewide coordinating entity shall make available  additional training opportu-
nities regarding cultural responsiveness and skill building,  as needed and as resources allow.
(f) Adopt rules  for carrying out the department’s responsibilities, duties and functions under this
section and ORS 419B.112.
(2) The department may:
[(a) Delegate to a statewide  coordinating entity contracted with under subsection (1)(b) of this sec-
tion the responsibility to: ]
[(A) Create, supervise and operate CASA Volunteer Programs throughout this state; and ]
[(B) Develop and provide training  for court appointed special advocates and employees and vol-
unteers of CASA Volunteer Programs. ]
[(b)] (a) Consult with [ public agencies or  private nonprofit organizations ] the statewide coordi-
nating entity contracted with under subsection (1)(a) of this section  for the purpose of devel-
oping:
(A) An allocation  formula for the disbursement of moneys to CASA Volunteer Programs in this
state; and
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 2
(B) Policies,  procedures, standards and guidelines regarding the provision of court appointed
special advocate services in this state  taking into consideration the National CASA
Association’s standards.
[(c)] (b) Apply for and receive funds from state, federal and private sources for CASA Volunteer
Programs and the provision of court appointed special advocate services in this state.
(3) The statewide  coordinating entity with which the department has contracted under sub-
section [ (1)(b)] (1)(a)  of this section[ , or to which the department has  delegated responsibilities under
subsection (2)(a) of this section, ] shall provide biannual reports to the department regarding:
(a) The fulfillment of responsibilities that have been contracted for or delegated; and
(b) [ When applicable to responsibilities contracted for or delegated, ] The achievement of the ob-
jectives in subsection [ (1)(d) to (g) ] (1)(b) and (c)  of this section.
[(4) The department shall report annually to committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to the
provision of court appointed special advocate services regarding the disbursement of moneys  in the
Court Appointed Special Advocate Fund established under ORS 184.498. The report must  summarize
the extent to which the statewide outcome or performance measures identified by  the department under
this section  are being met and include an analysis of the effectiveness of court appointed special advo-
cate services provided in this state. ]
SECTION 3.
 ORS 184.495 is amended to read:
184.495. Each  CASA Volunteer Program [ shall] may  report biannually to committees of the
Legislative Assembly related to the provision of court appointed special  advocate services. The
report may include  information regarding the program’s efforts to improve culturally spe-
cific and equitable  services, partnerships with community-based organizations, volunteer
recruitment efforts,  percentage of need for CASA Volunteer Program services met by the
program and demographic information relative to volunteers and children in foster care.  The
statewide coordinating  entity contracted with by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services
under ORS 184.492 may present  the biannual reports required under this section on behalf of the
CASA Volunteer Programs in this state. [ The report must include each program’s status with  respect
to the statewide outcome or performance measures identified by the department under ORS 184.492. ]
SECTION 4.  ORS 419A.004, as amended by section 26, chapter 14, Oregon  Laws 2020 (first
special session), and sections 17a and 17b, chapter 19, Oregon Laws  2020 (first special session), is
amended to read:
419A.004. As used in this chapter  and ORS chapters 419B and 419C, unless the context requires
otherwise:
(1) “Age-appropriate or developmentally appropriate activities” means:
(a) Activities or items  that are generally accepted as suitable for children of the same chrono-
logical age or level of  maturity or that are determined to be developmentally appropriate for a child,
based on  the development of cognitive, emotional, physical and behavioral capacities that are typical
for an age or age group; and
(b) In the case of a specific child, activities or items that are suitable for the child based on the
developmental stages attained by the child with respect to the cognitive,  emotional, physical and
behavioral capacities of the child.
(2) “Another planned permanent living arrangement” means an out-of-home placement for a ward
16 years of age or older that is consistent with the case plan and in  the best interests of the ward
other than placement:
(a) By adoption;
(b) With a legal guardian; or
(c) With a fit and willing relative.
(3) “CASA Volunteer Program”  means a program that is approved or sanctioned by a juvenile
court, has received accreditation  from the National CASA Association and has entered into a con-
tract with the statewide coordinating entity contracted with by the  Oregon Department of  Ad-
ministrative Services  under ORS 184.492 to recruit, train and supervise diverse and culturally
responsive volunteers to serve as court appointed special advocates.
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 3
(4) “Child care center” means a residential facility for wards or youth  offenders that is licensed,
certified or otherwise authorized as a child-caring agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(5) “Community service” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.126.
(6) “Conflict of interest” means a person appointed to a local citizen review board  who has a
personal or pecuniary interest in a case being reviewed by that board.
(7) “Counselor” means a juvenile department counselor or a county juvenile probation officer.
(8) “Court” means the juvenile court.
(9) “Court appointed special advocate” means a person in a CASA Volunteer Program who is
appointed by the court to act as a court appointed special advocate pursuant to ORS 419B.112.
(10) “Court facility” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(11) “Current caretaker” means a foster parent:
(a) Who is currently caring for a ward who  is in the legal custody of the Department of Human
Services and who has a permanency plan or concurrent permanent plan of adoption; and
(b) Who has cared for the ward, or at least one sibling of the ward, for  at least 12 cumulative
months or for one-half of the ward’s or sibling’s life where the ward or sibling is younger than  two
years of age, calculated cumulatively.
(12) “Department” means the Department of Human Services.
(13) “Detention”  or “detention facility” means a facility established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063 for the detention of youths or youth  offenders pursuant to a ju-
dicial commitment or order.
(14) “Director” means the  director of a juvenile department established under ORS 419A.010 to
419A.020 and 419A.050 to 419A.063.
(15) “Guardian” means guardian of the person and not guardian of the estate.
(16) “Indian child” has the meaning given that term in  section 2, chapter 14, Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session).
(17) “Juvenile court” means the  court having jurisdiction of juvenile matters in the several
counties of this state.
(18) “Local citizen review board” means the board specified by ORS 419A.090 and 419A.092.
(19) “Parent”  means the biological or adoptive mother and the legal parent of the child, ward,
youth or youth offender. As used in this subsection, “legal parent” means:
(a) A person who has adopted the child, ward, youth or youth offender or whose  parentage has
been established or declared under ORS 25.501 to 25.556 or 109.065 or by a juvenile court; and
(b) If the child is an Indian child, a man  whose parentage has been established as described in
section 4, chapter 14, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(20) “Permanent foster care” means an out-of-home placement  in which there is a long-term
contractual foster care agreement between the foster parents and the department that is approved
by the juvenile court and in which the  foster parents commit to raise a ward in substitute care or
youth offender until the age of majority.
(21) “Public building” has the meaning given that term in ORS 166.360.
(22) “Proctor foster home” has the meaning given that term in ORS 418.205.
(23) “Qualified  residential treatment program” means a program described in section 12b, chap-
ter 19, Oregon Laws 2020 (first special session).
(24) “Reasonable  and prudent parent standard” means the standard, characterized by careful and
sensible parental  decisions that maintain the health, safety and best interests of a child or ward
while encouraging the emotional  and developmental growth of the child or ward, that a substitute
care provider shall use when determining whether to  allow a child or ward in substitute care to
participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural and social activities.
(25) “Reasonable time” means a period of time that is reasonable given a child or ward’s emo-
tional and developmental needs and ability to form and maintain lasting attachments.
(26) “Records”  means any information in written form, pictures, photographs, charts, graphs,
recordings or documents pertaining to a case.
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 4
(27) “Resides” or “residence,” when used in  reference to the residence of a child, ward, youth
or youth offender, means the place where the  child, ward, youth or youth offender is actually living
or the jurisdiction in which wardship or jurisdiction has been established.
(28) “Restitution” has the meaning given that term in ORS 137.103.
(29) “Serious physical injury” means:
(a) A serious physical injury as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(b) A physical injury that:
(A) Has a permanent or protracted significant effect on a child’s daily activities;
(B) Results in substantial and recurring pain; or
(C) In the case of a child under 10 years of age, is a broken bone.
(30) “Shelter care” means a home or other facility suitable for  the safekeeping of a child, ward,
youth or youth offender who is taken into temporary custody pending investigation and  disposition.
(31) “Short-term detention facility” means a  facility established under ORS 419A.050 (3) for
holding youths and youth offenders pending further placement.
(32) “Sibling” means one of two or more children or wards related:
(a) By blood or adoption through a common legal parent; or
(b) Through the marriage of the children’s or wards’ legal or biological parents.
(33)(a) “Substitute care” means an out-of-home placement directly supervised by  the department
or other agency, including placement in a foster family home, group home, child-caring agency as
defined in ORS 418.205 or other child caring institution or facility.
(b) “Substitute care” does not include care in:
(A) A detention facility, forestry camp or youth correction facility;
(B) A family home that the court has approved as a ward’s permanent  placement, when a
child-caring agency as defined in ORS 418.205 has  been appointed guardian of the ward and when
the ward’s care is entirely privately financed;
(C) In-home placement subject to conditions or limitations;
(D) A facility or other entity that houses or provides services  only to youth offenders committed
to the custody of the Oregon Youth Authority by the juvenile court; or
(E) A youth offender foster home as that term is defined in ORS 420.888.
(34) “Surrogate”  means a person appointed by the court to protect the right of the child, ward,
youth or youth offender to receive procedural  safeguards with respect to the provision of free ap-
propriate public education.
(35) “Tribal court” has the meaning given  that term in section 2, chapter 14, Oregon Laws 2020
(first special session).
(36) “Victim” means any person determined by the district attorney, the juvenile  department or
the court to have suffered direct financial, psychological or physical  harm as a result of the act that
has brought the youth or youth offender before the juvenile court. When the victim is a  minor,
“victim” includes the  legal guardian of the minor. The youth or youth offender may not be consid-
ered the victim. When the victim of the crime cannot be determined, the people  of Oregon, as re-
presented by the district attorney, are considered the victims.
(37) “Violent felony” means any offense that, if committed  by an adult, would constitute a felony
and:
(a) Involves actual or threatened serious physical injury to a victim; or
(b) Is a sexual offense. As used in this  paragraph, “sexual offense” has the meaning given the
term “sex crime” in ORS 163A.005.
(38) “Ward” means a person within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court under ORS 419B.100.
(39) “Young person” means a person who has been  found responsible except for insanity under
ORS 419C.411 and placed under the jurisdiction of the Psychiatric Security Review Board.
(40) “Youth” means a  person under 18 years of age who is alleged to have committed an act that
is a violation, or, if done by an adult would constitute a violation, of a law or ordinance  of the
United States or a state, county or city.
(41) “Youth care center” has the meaning given that term in ORS 420.855.
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 5
(42) “Youth offender” means a person who has  been found to be within the jurisdiction of the
juvenile court under ORS 419C.005 for  an act committed when the person was under 18 years of age.
SECTION 5. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 17, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2738 (HB 2738-B) Page 6